New York, session 2025-2026, S9397.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this act, the following 2 terms shall have the following meanings: 3 1. "Educator development workforce" or "workforce" means the educator 4 development workforce initiative established pursuant to section two of 5 this act. 6 2. "EDHUBNY" means NYS Educator Workforce Development HUB, also known 7 as EDHUBNY, a nonprofit organization organized pursuant to section 8 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code. 9 § 2. Workforce established. 1. The commissioner of labor shall estab- 10 lish an educator development workforce initiative to act as an interme- 11 diary and provide technical assistance for education entities and child- 12 care providers to engage in registered apprenticeships and additional 13 child serving pathways, support, and retention strategies as necessary 14 to ensure that New York's children, from birth through high school grad- 15 uation, are supported by a stable, well-prepared child serving and 16 educator workforce. 17 2. The workforce shall collaborate with the department of education, 18 the office of children and family services, and any other relevant state 19 agencies to accomplish its purposes under this section. 20 3. Eligible participants with the workforce shall include, but not be 21 limited to, school districts, boards of cooperative educational 22 services, teacher centers, institutions of higher education, early 23 childhood providers, education intermediaries, and workforce development 24 organizations. 25 § 3. Workforce contracting with EDHUBNY. 1. The workforce shall be 26 authorized to contract with EDHUBNY for support of the purposes under 27 subdivision two of this section, and the allocation of funds to EDHUBNY, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14758-05-6 S. 9397--A 2 1 appropriated therefor pursuant to section five of this act, for the 2 purposes under subdivision three of this section. Such contracts shall 3 include performance measures, including the number of participants 4 served, reporting requirements, and fiscal controls consistent with 5 state law. EDHUBNY shall be subject to audit by the state comptroller 6 and shall maintain all financial and programmatic records for a minimum 7 of 6 years. 8 2. Contracts executed pursuant to subdivision one of this section may 9 provide for: 10 (a) Individual and group-sponsored registered apprenticeship programs 11 for educators and child-serving professionals from early childhood 12 through grade twelve; 13 (b) Grow-your-own educator pathways rooted in local communities; 14 (c) Strategic staffing and educator retention initiatives, including 15 stipends and innovative staffing models; 16 (d) Development of high-quality, streamlined credentialing pathways 17 for career changers in partnership with institutions of higher educa- 18 tion; and 19 (e) Professional development, mentoring, and technical assistance for 20 educators, mentors, employers, and intermediaries. 21 3. Funds appropriated pursuant to section five of this act and allo- 22 cated to EDHUBNY pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be 23 utilized by EDHUBNY as follows: 24 (a) To support employer and apprentice costs for up to 750 apprentices 25 statewide serving children from birth through high school graduation, 26 including wage offsets, tuition assistance, support services, and 27 certification guidance; 28 (b) For professional training and mentoring for experienced educators 29 and child care providers through non-profits such as teacher centers, 30 BOCES, or CUNY PDI; 31 (c) For EDHUBNY's ANEW program, the Association for a New Educator 32 Workforce, for statewide intermediary coordination and group apprentice- 33 ship sponsorship; 34 (d) To work with the department of education and institutions of high- 35 er education to develop streamlined credentialing pathways for career 36 changers; 37 (e) To pilot research-based strategic staffing and educator retention 38 models; and 39 (f) For implementation of any of the initiatives so contracted for 40 under subdivision two of this section. 41 § 4. On or after December 31, 2027, EDHUBNY, in consultation with the 42 workforce, shall submit a report to the governor, the temporary presi- 43 dent of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and the chairs of the 44 assembly committees on labor, education, and ways and means, detailing 45 outcomes, expenditures, workforce impact, and geographic distribution. 46 § 5. The sum of 50 million dollars ($50,000,000), or so much thereof 47 as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the educator development 48 workforce established pursuant to section two of this act out of any 49 moneys in the state treasury in the general fund to the credit of the 50 commissioner of labor, not otherwise appropriated, and made immediately 51 available, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this act. 52 Such moneys shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the comptroller 53 on vouchers certified or approved by the commissioner of labor in the 54 manner prescribed by law. 55 § 6. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.